Massachusetts, session 194th, H4269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, commencing with
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the assessors of the town of Wrentham may exempt from
taxation under chapter 59 of the General Laws the real estate owned by and occupied as the
domicile of the surviving spouse, until remarried, of George C. Labonte, a former deputy chief
for the Wrentham police department and resident of the town of Wrentham, who died on August
12, 2024.
Section 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1